Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3809
Court appearance; cooperation of consulate.

The department will request the cooperation of the appropriate consulate in order to notify a person who resides in a foreign country and is required to appear in a court in this state regarding the case of a foreign national minor or a minor having multiple nationalities.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB92, § 9.